Utah statutes.
63J-5-201.   Legislative Appropriation Subcommittees to review certain federal funds reauthorizations -- Executive Appropriations review -- Legislative approval.

(1)  The Governor's Office of Planning and Budget shall annually prepare and submit a federal funds request summary for each agency to the Legislative Fiscal Analyst at the same time the governor submits the confidential draft budget under Section 63J-1-201.

(2) (a)  The Legislative Fiscal Analyst, as directed by the Executive Appropriations Committee, may include federal funds in the base budget appropriations act or acts, when those acts are prepared as provided in JR3-2-402.

(b)  The Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall submit a federal funds request summary for each agency to the legislative appropriations subcommittee responsible for that agency's budget for review during each annual general session.

(3)  Each legislative appropriations subcommittee shall review the federal funds request summary and may:

(a)  recommend that the agency accept the federal funds or participate in the federal program for the fiscal year under consideration; or

(b)  recommend that the agency not accept the federal funds or not participate in the federal program for the fiscal year under consideration.

(4)  The Legislative Executive Appropriations Committee shall:

(a)  review each subcommittee's recommendation;

(b)  determine whether or not the agency should be authorized to accept the federal funds or participate in the federal program; and

(c)  direct the Legislative Fiscal Analyst to include or exclude those federal funds and federal programs in an annual appropriations act for approval by the Legislature.

(5)  Legislative approval of an appropriations act containing federal funds constitutes legislative approval of the federal grants or awards associated with the federal funds for the purposes of compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

